Maine, session 132, LD3.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §151, as repealed and replaced by PL 2019, c. 268, §1, is amended
to read:
§151. Standard time
1. Standard time. The standard time for the State is the time as determined by 15
United States Code, Sections 260 to 267 except that the standard time year-round for the
State is the time commonly known as eastern daylight time or eastern daylight saving time,
referred to in this section as "eastern daylight time," if: federal law or regulation permits
the year-round observation of daylight time.
A. Federal law permits the year-round observation of eastern daylight time; and
B. All the states in the eastern time zone and the District of Columbia observe eastern
daylight time year-round.
2. Secretary of State to monitor and provide public notice. The Secretary of State
shall monitor whether the conditions condition under subsection 1, paragraphs A and B
have has been met and provide public notice when each has been met. When both
conditions the condition under subsection 1, paragraphs A and B have has been met, the
Secretary of State shall issue a public notice announcing the effective date of year-round
eastern daylight time as established in subsection 3.
3. Effective date. Year-round eastern daylight time is effective immediately upon the
fulfillment of both conditions the condition in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B if the State
is observing eastern daylight time on the date both conditions are the condition is met.
Year-round eastern daylight time is effective on the next start date of eastern daylight time
after both conditions the condition in subsection 1, paragraphs A and B have has been met
if the State is not observing eastern daylight time on the date both of the conditions are
condition is met.
Page 1 - 132LR0082(03)